New York, session 2025-2026, A5163.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subsection (c) of section 612 of the tax law is amended by 2 adding a new paragraph 48 to read as follows: 3 (48) The amount of adoption fees including any and all medical and 4 legal fees, court costs and any other related expenses paid or incurred 5 by a taxpayer during the taxable year in connection with the adoption of 6 a child in the foster care system. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to all 8 taxable years beginning on or after the first of January in the year in 9 which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09188-01-5